src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/V-I-I-ikkitsinaattsi_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  +ero+:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.+fst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.+fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - ikkitsinaattsi - ok : # -m inanimate intransitive verb, appear AEW NA1
     PS/niit+ikkitsinaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: niitsikkitsinaattsiwa
     PS/iik+PS/oomok+ikkitsinaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: iikoomoksikkitsinaattsiwa
     PS/iik+PS/ohpo+ikkitsinaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: iikohpoikkitsinaattsiwa
     PS/ii+PS/ohkana+PS/omia'nist+ikkitsinaattsi+VII+Ind+0Pl: iihkanaomia'nistsikkitsinaattsiyi
     PS/yaak+PS/isttsikohpo+ikkitsinaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: aaksisttsikohpoikkitsinaattsiwa
     PS/yaak+PS/ipiiw+ikkitsinaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: aaksipiiyikkitsinaattsiwa
     PS/iik+PS/aanist+ikkitsinaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: iikanistsikkitsinaattsiwa
     PS/sikotahko+ikkitsinaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: sikotahkoikkitsinaattsiwa
     PS/ii+PS/sstsaap+ikkitsinaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: iisstsaapikkitsinaattsiwa
     PS/ii+PS/oohsi+ikkitsinaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: issiikkitsinaattsiwa
     PS/ipiiw+ikkitsinaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: piiyikkitsinaattsiwa
     PS/a+PS/apoyi+ikkitsinaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: aapoyiikkitsinaattsiwa
     PS/yaak+PS/aanist+ikkitsinaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: aakanistsikkitsinaattsiwa
     PS/yaak+PS/apoyi+ikkitsinaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: aakapoyiikkitsinaattsiwa
